src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5489 Y 1
SFX 5489 0 ōw .
PFX 5489 Y 1
PFX 5489 wō wo .
SFX 5490 Y 1
SFX 5490 0 u .
PFX 5490 Y 1
PFX 5490 wō wo .
SFX 5491 Y 1
SFX 5491 0 ym .
PFX 5491 Y 1
PFX 5491 wō wo .
SFX 5492 N 1
SFX 5492 el lo .
SFX 5493 N 1
SFX 5493 ōnski ojwynżsi .
SFX 5494 N 1
SFX 5494 ōnski ojwynższego .
SFX 5495 N 1
SFX 5495 ōnski ojwynższe .
SFX 5496 N 1
SFX 5496 ōnski ojwynższo .
SFX 5497 N 1
SFX 5497 ōnski ojwynższōm .
SFX 5498 N 1
SFX 5498 ōnski ojwynższych .
SFX 5499 N 1
SFX 5499 ōnski ojwynższyj .
SFX 5500 N 1
SFX 5500 ōnski ojwynższymi .
SFX 5501 N 1
SFX 5501 ōnski ojwynższymu .
SFX 5502 N 1
SFX 5502 ōnski ojwynższym .
SFX 5503 N 1
SFX 5503 ōnski ojwynższy .
SFX 5504 N 1
SFX 5504 ōnski ynżsi .
SFX 5505 N 1
SFX 5505 ōnski ynższego .
SFX 5506 N 1
SFX 5506 ōnski ynższe .
SFX 5507 N 1
SFX 5507 ōnski ynższo .
SFX 5508 N 1
SFX 5508 ōnski ynższōm .
SFX 5509 N 1
SFX 5509 ōnski ynższych .
SFX 5510 N 1
SFX 5510 ōnski ynższyj .
SFX 5511 N 1
SFX 5511 ōnski ynższymi .
SFX 5512 N 1
SFX 5512 ōnski ynższymu .
SFX 5513 N 1
SFX 5513 ōnski ynższym .
SFX 5514 N 1
SFX 5514 ōnski ynższy .
SFX 5515 N 1
SFX 5515 ōnsko ojwynżyj .
SFX 5516 N 1
SFX 5516 ōnsko ynżyj .
SFX 5517 Y 1
SFX 5517 0 ach .
PFX 5517 Y 1
PFX 5517 wō wy .
SFX 5518 Y 1
SFX 5518 0 ami .
PFX 5518 Y 1
PFX 5518 wō wy .
SFX 5519 Y 1
SFX 5519 0 a .
PFX 5519 Y 1
PFX 5519 wō wy .
SFX 5520 Y 1
SFX 5520 0 e .
PFX 5520 Y 1
PFX 5520 wō wy .
SFX 5521 Y 1
SFX 5521 0 owi .
PFX 5521 Y 1
PFX 5521 wō wy .
SFX 5522 Y 1
SFX 5522 0 ōm .
PFX 5522 Y 1
PFX 5522 wō wy .
SFX 5523 Y 1
SFX 5523 0 u .
PFX 5523 Y 1
PFX 5523 wō wy .
SFX 5524 Y 1
SFX 5524 0 ym .
PFX 5524 Y 1
PFX 5524 wō wy .
SFX 5525 Y 1
SFX 5525 0 y .
PFX 5525 Y 1
PFX 5525 wō wy .
SFX 5526 N 1
SFX 5526 eś odł .
SFX 5527 N 1
SFX 5527 ać ecie .
SFX 5528 N 1
SFX 5528 ać esz .
SFX 5529 N 1
SFX 5529 ać e .
SFX 5530 N 1
SFX 5530 ać rōm .
SFX 5531 N 1
SFX 5531 ać rōncego .
SFX 5532 N 1
SFX 5532 ać rōnce .
SFX 5533 N 1
SFX 5533 ać rōnco .
SFX 5534 N 1
SFX 5534 ać rōncōm .
SFX 5535 N 1
SFX 5535 ać rōnc .
SFX 5536 N 1
SFX 5536 ać rōncych .
SFX 5537 N 1
SFX 5537 ać rōncyj .
SFX 5538 N 1
SFX 5538 ać rōncymi .
SFX 5539 N 1
SFX 5539 ać rōncymu .
SFX 5540 N 1
SFX 5540 ać rōncym .
SFX 5541 N 1
SFX 5541 ać rōncy .
SFX 5542 N 1
SFX 5542 ać ymy .
SFX 5543 N 1
SFX 5543 ednōńć odł .
SFX 5544 N 1
SFX 5544 cy ke .
SFX 5545 N 1
SFX 5545 cy kich .
SFX 5546 N 1
SFX 5546 cy kie .
SFX 5547 N 1
SFX 5547 cy kimi .
SFX 5548 N 1
SFX 5548 cy kim .
SFX 5549 N 1
SFX 5549 o igo .
SFX 5550 N 1
SFX 5550 o imu .
SFX 5551 N 1
SFX 5551 o im .
SFX 5552 N 1
SFX 5552 gnać żyna .
SFX 5553 N 1
SFX 5553 gnać żyniecie .
SFX 5554 N 1
SFX 5554 gnać żyniesz .
SFX 5555 N 1
SFX 5555 gnać żynie .
SFX 5556 N 1
SFX 5556 gnać żyniynciach .
SFX 5557 N 1
SFX 5557 gnać żyniynciami .
SFX 5558 N 1
SFX 5558 gnać żyniyncia .
SFX 5559 N 1
SFX 5559 gnać żyniyncie .
SFX 5560 N 1
SFX 5560 gnać żyniyncio .
SFX 5561 N 1
SFX 5561 gnać żyniynciōm .
SFX 5562 N 1
SFX 5562 gnać żyniynciu .
SFX 5563 N 1
SFX 5563 gnać żyniynci .
SFX 5564 N 1
SFX 5564 gnać żyniynciym .
SFX 5565 N 1
SFX 5565 gnać żyniynć .
SFX 5566 N 1
SFX 5566 gnać żyniyntego .
SFX 5567 N 1
SFX 5567 gnać żyniynte .
SFX 5568 N 1
SFX 5568 gnać żyniynto .
SFX 5569 N 1
SFX 5569 gnać żyniyntōm .
SFX 5570 N 1
SFX 5570 gnać żyniyntych .
SFX 5571 N 1
SFX 5571 gnać żyniyntyj .
SFX 5572 N 1
SFX 5572 gnać żyniyntymi .
SFX 5573 N 1
SFX 5573 gnać żyniyntymu .
SFX 5574 N 1
SFX 5574 gnać żyniyntym .
SFX 5575 N 1
SFX 5575 gnać żyniynty .
SFX 5576 N 1
SFX 5576 gnać żynōm .
SFX 5577 N 1
SFX 5577 gnać żynōncego .
SFX 5578 N 1
SFX 5578 gnać żynōnce .
SFX 5579 N 1
SFX 5579 gnać żynōnco .
SFX 5580 N 1
SFX 5580 gnać żynōncōm .
SFX 5581 N 1
SFX 5581 gnać żynōnc .
SFX 5582 N 1
SFX 5582 gnać żynōncych .
SFX 5583 N 1
SFX 5583 gnać żynōncyj .
SFX 5584 N 1
SFX 5584 gnać żynōncymi .
SFX 5585 N 1
SFX 5585 gnać żynōncymu .
SFX 5586 N 1
SFX 5586 gnać żynōncym .
SFX 5587 N 1
SFX 5587 gnać żynōncy .
SFX 5588 N 1
SFX 5588 gnać żynymy .
SFX 5589 N 1
SFX 5589 gnać żyńcie .
SFX 5590 N 1
SFX 5590 gnać żyńmy .
SFX 5591 N 1
SFX 5591 gnać żyń .
SFX 5592 N 1
SFX 5592 zoł łach .
SFX 5593 N 1
SFX 5593 zoł łami .
SFX 5594 N 1
SFX 5594 zoł łōm .
SFX 5595 N 1
SFX 5595 zoł łōw .
SFX 5596 N 1
SFX 5596 zoł ły .
SFX 5597 N 1
SFX 5597 zoł źle .
SFX 5598 N 1
SFX 5598 ōńć lich .
SFX 5599 N 1
SFX 5599 ōńć łych .
SFX 5600 Y 1
SFX 5600 soki żsi .
PFX 5600 Y 1
PFX 5600 0 noj .
SFX 5601 Y 1
SFX 5601 soki ższego .
PFX 5601 Y 1
PFX 5601 0 noj .
SFX 5602 Y 1
SFX 5602 soki ższe .
PFX 5602 Y 1
PFX 5602 0 noj .
SFX 5603 Y 1
SFX 5603 soki ższo .
PFX 5603 Y 1
PFX 5603 0 noj .
SFX 5604 Y 1
SFX 5604 soki ższōm .
PFX 5604 Y 1
PFX 5604 0 noj .
SFX 5605 Y 1
SFX 5605 soki ższych .
PFX 5605 Y 1
PFX 5605 0 noj .
SFX 5606 Y 1
SFX 5606 soki ższyj .
PFX 5606 Y 1
PFX 5606 0 noj .
SFX 5607 Y 1
SFX 5607 soki ższymi .
PFX 5607 Y 1
PFX 5607 0 noj .
SFX 5608 Y 1
SFX 5608 soki ższymu .
PFX 5608 Y 1
PFX 5608 0 noj .
SFX 5609 Y 1
SFX 5609 soki ższym .
PFX 5609 Y 1
PFX 5609 0 noj .
SFX 5610 Y 1
SFX 5610 soki ższy .
PFX 5610 Y 1
PFX 5610 0 noj .
SFX 5611 N 1
SFX 5611 soki żsi .
SFX 5612 N 1
SFX 5612 soki ższego .
SFX 5613 N 1
SFX 5613 soki ższe .
SFX 5614 N 1
SFX 5614 soki ższo .
SFX 5615 N 1
SFX 5615 soki ższōm .
SFX 5616 N 1
SFX 5616 soki ższych .
SFX 5617 N 1
SFX 5617 soki ższyj .
SFX 5618 N 1
SFX 5618 soki ższymi .
SFX 5619 N 1
SFX 5619 soki ższymu .
SFX 5620 N 1
SFX 5620 soki ższym .
SFX 5621 N 1
SFX 5621 soki ższy .
SFX 5622 Y 1
SFX 5622 soko żyj .
PFX 5622 Y 1
PFX 5622 0 noj .
SFX 5623 N 1
SFX 5623 soko żyj .
SFX 5624 N 1
SFX 5624 yś edziōno .
SFX 5625 Y 1
SFX 5625 sły ślyjsi .
PFX 5625 Y 1
PFX 5625 0 noj .
SFX 5626 Y 1
SFX 5626 sły ślyjszego .
PFX 5626 Y 1
PFX 5626 0 noj .
SFX 5627 Y 1
SFX 5627 sły ślyjsze .
PFX 5627 Y 1
PFX 5627 0 noj .
SFX 5628 Y 1
SFX 5628 sły ślyjszo .
PFX 5628 Y 1
PFX 5628 0 noj .
SFX 5629 Y 1
SFX 5629 sły ślyjszōm .
PFX 5629 Y 1
PFX 5629 0 noj .
SFX 5630 Y 1
SFX 5630 sły ślyjszych .
PFX 5630 Y 1
PFX 5630 0 noj .
SFX 5631 Y 1
SFX 5631 sły ślyjszyj .
PFX 5631 Y 1
PFX 5631 0 noj .
SFX 5632 Y 1
SFX 5632 sły ślyjszymi .
PFX 5632 Y 1
PFX 5632 0 noj .
SFX 5633 Y 1
SFX 5633 sły ślyjszymu .
PFX 5633 Y 1
PFX 5633 0 noj .
SFX 5634 Y 1
SFX 5634 sły ślyjszym .
PFX 5634 Y 1
PFX 5634 0 noj .
SFX 5635 Y 1
SFX 5635 sły ślyjszy .
PFX 5635 Y 1
PFX 5635 0 noj .
SFX 5636 N 1
SFX 5636 sły ślyjsi .
SFX 5637 N 1
SFX 5637 sły ślyjszego .
SFX 5638 N 1
SFX 5638 sły ślyjsze .
SFX 5639 N 1
SFX 5639 sły ślyjszo .
SFX 5640 N 1
SFX 5640 sły ślyjszōm .
SFX 5641 N 1
SFX 5641 sły ślyjszych .
SFX 5642 N 1
SFX 5642 sły ślyjszyj .
SFX 5643 N 1
SFX 5643 sły ślyjszymi .
SFX 5644 N 1
SFX 5644 sły ślyjszymu .
SFX 5645 N 1
SFX 5645 sły ślyjszym .
SFX 5646 N 1
SFX 5646 sły ślyjszy .
SFX 5647 N 1
SFX 5647 ōść osbych .
SFX 5648 N 1
SFX 5648 ōść osbyś .
SFX 5649 N 1
SFX 5649 ōść osby .
SFX 5650 N 1
SFX 5650 ōść oslibymy .
SFX 5651 N 1
SFX 5651 ōść oslibyście .
SFX 5652 N 1
SFX 5652 ōść osliby .
SFX 5653 N 1
SFX 5653 ōść oslichmy .
SFX 5654 N 1
SFX 5654 ōść oslimy .
SFX 5655 N 1
SFX 5655 ōść osliście .
SFX 5656 N 1
SFX 5656 ōść osli .
SFX 5657 N 1
SFX 5657 ōść osłaś .
SFX 5658 N 1
SFX 5658 ōść osłeś .
SFX 5659 N 1
SFX 5659 ōść os .
SFX 5660 N 1
SFX 5660 ōść ośniyńciach .
SFX 5661 N 1
SFX 5661 ōść ośniyńciami .
SFX 5662 N 1
SFX 5662 ōść ośniyńcia .
SFX 5663 N 1
SFX 5663 ōść ośniyńcie .
SFX 5664 N 1
SFX 5664 ōść ośniyńcio .
SFX 5665 N 1
SFX 5665 ōść ośniyńciōm .
SFX 5666 N 1
SFX 5666 ōść ośniyńciu .
SFX 5667 N 1
SFX 5667 ōść ośniyńciym .
SFX 5668 N 1
SFX 5668 ōść ośniyńć .
SFX 5669 N 1
SFX 5669 ōś oslichmy .
SFX 5670 N 1
SFX 5670 ōś osliście .
SFX 5671 N 1
SFX 5671 ōś osli .
SFX 5672 N 1
SFX 5672 ōś osłaś .
SFX 5673 N 1
SFX 5673 ōś osłeś .
SFX 5674 N 1
SFX 5674 ōś os .
SFX 5675 N 1
SFX 5675 ōś ośniyńciach .
SFX 5676 N 1
SFX 5676 ōś ośniyńciami .
SFX 5677 N 1
SFX 5677 ōś ośniyńcia .
SFX 5678 N 1
SFX 5678 ōś ośniyńcie .
SFX 5679 N 1
SFX 5679 ōś ośniyńcio .
SFX 5680 N 1
SFX 5680 ōś ośniyńciōm .
SFX 5681 N 1
SFX 5681 ōś ośniyńciu .
SFX 5682 N 1
SFX 5682 ōś ośniyńciym .
