src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
wrać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,288,5527,422,423,424,5528,5529,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,5530,5531,5532,5533,5534,5535,5536,5537,5538,5539,5540,5541,5542
wszyjscy/5544,5545,5546,5547,5548
wszyjsko/5549,5550,5551
wyjeś/1968,1969,1970,1971,1972,1973,1974,1975,1976,1977,1978,1979,1980,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,1986,1987,1988,1989,1990,1991,1992,1993,1994,1995,1996,1997,1998,1999,2000,2001,5526,2002,2003,2004,2005,2006,2007,2008,2009
wysiednōńć/2445,2446,2447,2448,2449,2450,2451,2452,2453,2454,2455,2456,2457,2458,2459,154,155,156,157,158,159,160,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,210,2460,211,2461,2462,2463,2464,2465,5543,2466
wysoki/5600,5601,5602,5603,5604,5605,5606,5607,5608,5609,5610,81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,5611,5612,5613,5614,5615,5616,5617,5618,5619,5620,5621
wysoko/5622,5623
wzrōś/5669,5670,5671,2414,5672,2415,2416,5673,2417,2418,2419,2420,2421,2422,2423,5674,2424,2425,2426,2427,2428,2429,2430,2431,2432,2433,2434,2435,2436,2437,2438,2439,2440,5675,5676,5677,5678,5679,5680,5681,5682,5683
wzrōść/5647,5648,5649,5650,5651,5652,5653,5654,5655,5656,2376,2377,2378,2379,5657,2380,2381,5658,2382,2383,2384,2385,2386,2387,2388,2389,2390,2391,2392,2393,5659,2394,2395,2396,2397,2398,2399,2400,2401,2402,2403,2404,2405,2406,2407,2408,2409,2410,5660,5661,5662,5663,5664,5665,5666,5667,5668
wōdz/5483,5484,5485,5486,5487,5488,5489,5490,5491
wōngel/270,271,273,5492,275,276,438,277,278
wōnski/5493,5494,5495,5496,5497,5498,5499,5500,5501,5502,5503,81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,5504,5505,5506,5507,5508,5509,5510,5511,5512,5513,5514
wōnsko/5515,5516
wōnż/5517,5518,5519,5520,5521,5522,5523,5524,5525
zaczōńć/1317,1318,1319,1320,5598,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1327,1328,1329,1332,1333,1334,1335,1336,1337,5599,1338,1339,1340,1342,1343,1344,1345,4064,4065,4066,1366,1368,954,955,969,970,971,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803
zagnać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,5552,5553,5554,5555,5556,5557,5558,5559,5560,5561,5562,5563,5564,5565,5566,5567,5568,5569,5570,5571,5572,5573,5574,5575,5576,5577,5578,5579,5580,5581,5582,5583,5584,5585,5586,5587,5588,5589,5590,5591
zaklōńć/1317,1318,1319,1320,5598,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1327,1328,1329,1332,1333,1334,1335,1336,1337,5599,1338,1339,1340,1342,1343,1344,1345,4064,4065,4066,1366,1368,954,955,969,970,971,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803
zasiednōńć/2445,2446,2447,2448,2449,2450,2451,2452,2453,2454,2455,2456,2457,2458,2459,154,155,156,157,158,159,160,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,210,2460,211,2461,2462,2463,2464,2465,5543,2466
zawiyś/2590,2591,2592,2593,2594,2595,2596,2597,2598,2599,2600,2601,5624,2602,2603,2604,2605,2606,2607,2608,2609,2610,2611,2612,2613,2614,2615,2616,2617,2618,2619,2620,2621,2622,2623,2624,2625,2626,2091,2092,2093
zegnać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,5552,5553,5554,5555,5556,5557,5558,5559,5560,5561,5562,5563,5564,5565,5566,5567,5568,5569,5570,5571,5572,5573,5574,5575,5576,5577,5578,5579,5580,5581,5582,5583,5584,5585,5586,5587,5588,5589,5590,5591
zjeś/1968,1969,1970,1971,1972,1973,1974,1975,1976,1977,1978,1979,1980,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,1986,1987,1988,1989,1990,1991,1992,1993,1994,1995,1996,1997,1998,1999,2000,2001,5526,2002,2003,2004,2005,2006,2007,2008,2009
zwiyś/2590,2591,2592,2593,2594,2595,2596,2597,2598,2599,2600,2601,5624,2602,2603,2604,2605,2606,2607,2608,2609,2610,2611,2612,2613,2614,2615,2616,2617,2618,2619,2620,2621,2622,2623,2624,2625,2626,2091,2092,2093
